src/morphology/inflection/nouns.lexc
LEXICON N_FRONT_CLIT
[CLIT=HAN]:%>hän   #        ;
[CLIT=HAN][CLIT=KAAN]:%>hänkään  #        ;
[CLIT=HAN][CLIT=KO]:%>hänkö #        ;
[CLIT=HAN][CLIT=PA]:%>hänpä #        ;
[CLIT=KO]:%>kö #        ;
[CLIT=KO][CLIT=HAN]:%>köhän #        ;
[CLIT=KO][CLIT=KAAN]:%>kökään    #        ;
[CLIT=KO][CLIT=KIN]:%>kökin    #        ;
[CLIT=KO][CLIT=PA]:%>köpä   #        ;
[CLIT=KO][CLIT=S]:%>kös    #        ;
[CLIT=PA]:%>pä #        ;
[CLIT=PA][CLIT=HAN]:%>pähän #        ;
[CLIT=PA][CLIT=KAAN]:%>päkään    #        ;
[CLIT=PA][CLIT=KIN]:%>päkin    #        ;
[CLIT=PA][CLIT=KO]:%>päkö   #        ;
[CLIT=PA][CLIT=S]:%>päs    #        ;
[CLIT=KIN]:%>kin  #        ;
[CLIT=KIN][CLIT=HAN]:%>kinhän  #        ;
[CLIT=KIN][CLIT=KAAN]:%>kinkään #        ;
[CLIT=KIN][CLIT=KO]:%>kinkö    #        ;
[CLIT=KIN][CLIT=PA]:%>kinpä    #        ;
[CLIT=KAAN]:%>kään  #        ;
[CLIT=KAAN][CLIT=HAN]:%>käänhän  #        ;
[CLIT=KAAN][CLIT=KIN]:%>käänkin #        ;
[CLIT=KAAN][CLIT=KO]:%>käänkö    #        ;
[CLIT=KAAN][CLIT=PA]:%>käänpä    #        ;

LEXICON N_BACK_CLIT_OPT
0    #   ;
0   N_BACK_CLIT    ;

LEXICON N_FRONT_CLIT_OPT
0    #   ;
0   N_FRONT_CLIT    ;

LEXICON N_BACK_SINGULARS
0    N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS ;
0    N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;

LEXICON N_FRONT_SINGULARS
0    N_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS ;
0    N_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;

LEXICON N_FRONT_PLURALS
0   N_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0   N_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS ;

LEXICON N_BACK_PLURALS
0   N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0   N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS ;

LEXICON N_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT
0    N_BACK_POSS   ;
0    N_BACK_POSS_AN ;
0    N_BACK_CLIT ;
0    #    ;

LEXICON N_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT
0    N_FRONT_POSS   ;
0    N_FRONT_POSS_ÄN  ;
0    N_FRONT_CLIT ;
0    #    ;

LEXICON N_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT
0    N_BACK_POSS   ;
0    N_BACK_POSS_EN ;
0    N_BACK_CLIT ;
0    #    ;

LEXICON N_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT
0    N_FRONT_POSS   ;
0    N_FRONT_POSS_EN  ;
0    N_FRONT_CLIT ;
0    #    ;

LEXICON N_BACK_POSS_OPT
0    N_BACK_POSS   ;
0    N_BACK_CLIT ;
0    #    ;

LEXICON N_FRONT_POSS_OPT
0    N_FRONT_POSS   ;
0    N_FRONT_CLIT ;
0    #    ;

LEXICON N_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL
0   N_BACK_POSS  ;
0   N_BACK_POSS_EN   ;

LEXICON N_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL
0   N_FRONT_POSS  ;
0   N_FRONT_POSS_EN   ;

LEXICON N_COMPOUND_0
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:0   N_COMPOUND  ;

LEXICON N_COMPOUND_N
[NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:%>n               N_COMPOUND    ;

LEXICON N_COMPOUND_IEN
[NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:%>i%>en                 N_COMPOUND  ;

LEXICON N_COMPOUND_IDEN
[NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:%>i%>den                 N_COMPOUND  ;

LEXICON N_COMPOUND_IN
[NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:%>i%>n                 N_COMPOUND     ;

LEXICON N_COMPOUND_ITTEN
[NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:%>i%>tten               N_COMPOUND     ;

LEXICON N_COMPOUND_JEN
[NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:%>j%>en                 N_COMPOUND     ;

LEXICON N_COMPOUND_TEN
[NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:%>ten                 N_COMPOUND     ;

LEXICON N_COMPOUND_S
[DRV=S]:»s                   N_COMPOUND  ;

LEXICON N_COMPOUND
[GUESS=COMPOUND]:0{#}     NOMINAL   ;
